Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE J. PAYMENT FOR HEALTH CARE SERVICES AND SUPPLIES

CHAPTER 185. HEALTH CARE BILLING

Sec. 185.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Debt collection" has the meaning assigned by Section 392.001, Finance Code.

(2) "Health care provider" means a facility licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized to provide health care services or supplies in this state in the ordinary course of business, including a hospital, except the term does not include a federally-qualified health center, as defined by 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)(2)(B).

(3) "Health care service" means a service a health care provider provides to an individual to diagnose, prevent, treat, alleviate, cure, or heal a human health condition, illness, injury, or disease.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 271 (S.B. 490), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 185.002. ITEMIZED BILL REQUIRED. (a) A health care provider that requests payment from a patient after providing a health care service or related supply to the patient shall submit with the request a written, itemized bill of the alleged cost of each service and supply provided to the patient during the patient's visit to the provider. The provider must submit the itemized bill not later than the 30th day after the provider receives a final payment on the provided service or supply from a third party.

(b) The itemized bill must include:

(1) a plain language description of each distinct health care service or supply the health care provider provided to the patient;

(2) if the provider sought or is seeking reimbursement from a third party, any billing code submitted to the third party and the amounts billed to and paid by that third party; and

(3) the amount the provider alleges is due from the patient for each service and supply provided to the patient.

(c) A health care provider may issue the itemized bill electronically, including through a patient portal on the provider's Internet website.

(d) A patient is entitled to obtain from the health care provider an itemized bill on request at any time after the itemized bill is initially issued under Subsection (a).

(e) A health care provider may not pursue debt collection against a patient for a provided health care service or supply unless the provider has complied with this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 271 (S.B. 490), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 185.003. DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY LICENSING AUTHORITY. The appropriate licensing authority shall take disciplinary action against the provider for the violation as if the provider violated an applicable licensing law.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 271 (S.B. 490), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.